Arkansas, session 2025, SB238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-9-404, concerning rim removal fees,
import fees, and commercial generator fees under the Used Tire Recycling and
Accountability Act, is amended to read as follows:
8-9-404. Rim removal Tire recycling fees — Import fees — Commercial
generator fees — Definitions Definition.
(a)(1) There is imposed a rim removal fee upon the transaction of
removing a tire from a rim that is related to the sale of a replacement tire
by a tire retailer.
(2) The rim removal fee shall be charged by the tire retailer to
a person who:
(A) Purchases a replacement tire for a rim that
necessitates the removal of a different tire from the same rim; or
(B) Purchases the service of removal of a tire from a rim
and replacement with a tire that was not purchased from the tire retailer if
the person requesting the rim removal cannot show proof of payment of the rim
removal fee under this section for the replacement tire.
(3)(A) The rim removal fee shall be imposed at the rate of three
dollars ($3.00) for each new tire that replaces a tire removed from a rim and
*JMB379*
04-07-2025 14:26:21 JMB379

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H4/7/25 SB238
one dollar ($1.00) for each used tire that replaces the tire removed from the
rim.
(B) Except for the rim removal fees imposed under this
section, a tire retailer shall not charge any other fee to a person who
purchases the service of removal of a tire from a rim.
(C) For any tires collected by a tire retailer, the tire
retailer shall ensure that the tires are transported by a licensed tire
transporter to a permitted tire collection center, a solid waste management
facility, a tire processing facility, or another tire retailer.
(D) The tire retailer shall account for each tire removed
from a rim in the manner prescribed by the Department of Finance and
Administration.
(E) Each tire retailer shall register with the department
and comply with all requirements related to collecting and reporting rim
removal fees.
(4) The rim removal fees imposed under this section shall be
added to the total cost charged by the tire retailer to the purchaser after
all applicable gross receipts or compensating use taxes on the tires have
been computed and shall be separately stated on the invoice or bill of sale.
(5)(A) The rim removal fees imposed under this section shall be
paid monthly to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration.
(B) However, the tire retailer may retain five percent
(5%) of the rim removal fee imposed under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this
section for administrative costs.
(6)(A) The rim removal fees remitted under subdivision (a)(5)(A)
of this section shall be collected by the secretary and shall be subject to
the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq. and the business closure
procedures under § 26-18-1001 et seq.
(B)(i) Each tire retailer shall file a return with the
secretary on or before the twentieth of each month.
(ii) The return shall show the total rim removal fees
collected for each tire removed from the rim during the preceding calendar
month.
(iii) The tire retailer shall remit the rim removal
fees with the return.
04-07-2025 14:26:21 JMB379

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H4/7/25 SB238
(iv) The secretary shall prescribe the form and
contents of the return.
(a)(1)(A)(i) A tire recycling fee of three dollars ($3.00) is imposed
for each new small tire sold by a tire retailer in Arkansas, including
without limitation new small tires sold as part of fleet services.
(ii) A tire retailer may charge a fee of up to ten
percent (10%) over the tire recycling fee for each new small tire sold by the
tire retailer and retain the excess over the tire recycling fee to cover
administrative costs of the tire retailer.
(B) A tire retailer shall obtain a tire recycling account
number from the Department of Finance and Administration and remit the tire
recycling fees collected by the tire retailer to the department on a monthly
basis.
(C) A tire retailer shall:
(i) Track all new small tires sold by the tire
retailer; and
(ii) Provide an accounting to the department that
includes the number and category of new small tires sold in Arkansas.
(D) A tire retailer is subject to field audits by the
department.
(E)(i) If a person or entity brings a new small tire
purchased from an entity other than the tire retailer to the tire retailer to
be placed on a motor vehicle, the tire retailer shall require the person or
entity to pay the tire recycling fee under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
section unless the person or entity can show that the tire recycling fee was
already paid.
(ii) The tire retailer shall not collect the tire
recycling fee or require proof of payment of the tire recycling fee under
subdivision (a)(1)(E)(i) of this section unless the small tire has eighty
percent (80%) or more of the small tire's vent spews remaining.
(F) No later than the tenth business day of each month, a
tire retailer shall submit a report to the department that reflects all new
small tires sold by the tire retailer for the previous month and the
corresponding tire recycling fees remitted to the department.
(2)(A) A tire recycling fee is imposed for each new small tire
equipped in or on a new motor vehicle or trailer sold to a purchaser.
04-07-2025 14:26:21 JMB379

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H4/7/25 SB238
(B) The tire recycling fee under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of
this section shall be three dollars ($3.00) for each new small tire equipped
in or on the new motor vehicle or trailer, including a new small tire used as
a spare in or on the new motor vehicle or trailer.
(C) Tire recycling fees under subdivision (a)(2)(B) of
this section shall be collected by the department at the same time as the new
motor vehicle or trailer is registered by the purchaser with the department.
(b)(1) The department shall deposit the proceeds from rim removal tire
recycling fees collected under subsection (a) of this section into the State
Treasury as special revenues to the credit of the following funds in the
following percentages:
(A) Ninety-three percent (93%) to be deposited into the
Used Tire Recycling Fund; and
(B) Seven percent (7%), not to exceed the amount deposited
in fiscal year 2025, to be deposited into the Division of Environmental
Quality Fee Trust Fund.
(2) As used in this section, “proceeds from rim removal tire
recycling fees” means all moneys collected and received by the department
under this section for rim removal tire recycling fees imposed under
subsection (a) of this section and interest and penalties on delinquent rim
removal tire recycling fees.
(c)(1)(A) There is imposed an import fee of one dollar ($1.00) on each
used tire that is imported into Arkansas A tire recycling fee may be imposed
by a tire retailer on a large tire or an extra-large tire.
(2)(A) The amount of the tire recycling fee on a large tire or
extra-large tire may not exceed the following fee per tire:
(1) For a large tire, five dollars ($5.00); and
(ii) For an extra-large tire, thirty dollars
($30.00).
(B) A tire retailer may charge a fee of up to ten percent
(10%) over the tire recycling fee for a new large tire or a new extra-large
tire sold by the tire retailer and retain the excess over the tire recycling
fee to cover administrative costs of the tire retailer.
(3) The tire recycling fee for a large tire or an extra-large
tire may be changed by a tire accountability board only one (1) time per year
at the time the business plan for the tire accountability zone is submitted
04-07-2025 14:26:21 JMB379

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H4/7/25 SB238
for the fiscal year.
(4)(A) The tire accountability board shall report the proposed
tire recycling fee for a large tire or extra-large tire authorized under this
subsection to the department by September 30 of each year.
(B) The department shall:
(i) Average the tire recycling fees proposed by the
four (4) tire accountability boards; and
(ii) Set a statewide tire recycling fee for a large
tire or an extra-large tire that may be charged by the tire retailer under
this subsection.
(B) A person who imports a used tire shall be registered
with the department and comply with all requirements related to collecting
and reporting import fees.
(2) The import fee imposed under this subsection shall be paid
by the person who imports the used tire to the department in accordance with
the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq., the business closure
procedures under § 26-18-1001 et seq., and any rules promulgated by the
department.
(3)(A) The department shall deposit the proceeds from import
fees imposed under this subsection into the State Treasury as special
revenues to the credit of the following funds in the following percentages:
(i) Ninety-three percent (93%) to be deposited into
the Used Tire Recycling Fund; and
(ii) Seven percent (7%) to be deposited into the
Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund.
(B) As used in this section, “proceeds from import fees”
means all moneys collected and received by the department under this
subsection and interest and penalties on delinquent import fees.
(d)(1) There is imposed a commercial generator fee upon the
transaction of a commercial generator selling or delivering a new tire as
part of fleet services The department has exclusive authority and
responsibility to audit tire retailers for compliance with this subchapter.
(2) The commercial generator fee shall be charged by the
commercial generator to a person who in the ordinary course of business is an
end user that removes used tires from the rim and replaces them with a new
tire.
04-07-2025 14:26:21 JMB379

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H4/7/25 SB238
(3)(A) The commercial generator fee shall be imposed at the rate
of three dollars ($3.00) for each new tire that is sold or delivered to an
end user that removes used tires from the rim and replaces them with a new
tire.
(B) Except for the commercial generator fees imposed under
this section, the commercial generator shall not charge any other fee to the
end user.
(C)(i) For any used tires collected by a commercial
generator, the first transportation of the used tire from the end user to the
commercial generator's facility does not require a licensed tire transporter.
(ii) Any subsequent transportation of the used tire
by the commercial generator for recycling or disposal requires a licensed
tire transporter and shall be accounted for using the electronic uniform used
tire manifest system.
(D) Each commercial generator shall register with the
department and comply with all requirements related to collecting and
reporting commercial generator fees.
(4) The commercial generator fees imposed under this section
shall be added to the total cost charged by the commercial generator to the
end user after all applicable gross receipts or compensating use taxes on the
tires have been computed and shall be separately stated on the invoice or
bill of sale.
(5)(A) The commercial generator fees imposed under this section
shall be paid monthly to the secretary.
(B) However, the commercial generator may retain five
percent (5%) of the commercial generator fee imposed under subdivision
(d)(3)(A) of this section for administrative costs.
(6)(A) The commercial generator fees remitted in subdivision
(d)(5)(A) of this section shall be collected by the secretary and shall be
subject to the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq. and the
business closure procedures under § 26-18-1001 et seq.
(B)(i)(a) Each commercial generator shall file a return
with the secretary on or before the twentieth of each month.
(b) The return shall show the total commercial
generator fees collected for each tire sold or delivered to the end user
during the preceding calendar month.
04-07-2025 14:26:21 JMB379

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H4/7/25 SB238
(c) The commercial generator shall remit the
commercial generator fees with the return.
(ii) The secretary shall prescribe the form and
contents of the return.
(7) The department shall deposit the proceeds from commercial
generator fees collected under this subsection into the State Treasury as
special revenues to the credit of the following funds in the following
percentages:
(A) Ninety-three percent (93%) to be deposited into the
Used Tire Recycling Fund; and
(B) Seven percent (7%) to be deposited into the Division
of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund.
(8) As used in this section, “proceeds from commercial generator
fees” means all moneys collected and received by the department under this
section for commercial generator fees imposed under this subsection and
interest and penalties on delinquent commercial generator fees.
(e)(1) It is the purpose and intent of this section that only one (1)
of the following fees imposed under this section be charged for the
transaction of removing a tire from a rim that is related to the sale of a
replacement tire:
(A) The rim removal fee; or
(B) The commercial generator fee.
(2) If a person establishes that he or she has paid one (1) of
the fees for a tire, the tire retailer or tire generator shall not charge an
additional fee for that tire.
This section applies to in-state and out-of-state tire retailers that
sell tires within the state.
(2) The department shall enforce this section under the Arkansas
Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq., and the business closure procedures
under § 26-18-1001 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-9-405(b)(9)(A), concerning the used tire
program reimbursements, is amended to read as follows:
(9)(A) Establish a minimum of two (2) tire collection centers
within each county served by the used tire program that accepts tires from
tire retailers at no charge if the tire retailer establishes that it:
04-07-2025 14:26:21 JMB379

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H4/7/25 SB238
(i) Collects the rim removal tire recycling fee
imposed under § 8-9-404(a); and
(ii) Complies with the electronic uniform used tire
manifest system under § 8-9-407.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 8-9-405(b)(9), concerning the establishment
of tire collection centers within each county under the used tire programs,
is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(C) A tire collection center shall be monitored and
emptied regularly to allow continuous use of the tire collection center for
waste tire disposal; and

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 8-9-410(b)(1), concerning the used tire
programs and the tire accountability boards, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Each new used tire program is governed by a tire accountability
board that is composed of eleven (11) thirteen (13) members:
(A) Five (5) county judges, elected by the county judges
of the used tire program;
(B) Two (2) county judges, appointed from the two (2) most
populous counties in the used tire program according to the most recent
federal census; and
(C) Four (4) mayors, elected by the mayors of all of the
cities in the used tire program; and
(D) Two (2) tire retailers, appointed by the Governor.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 8-9-412 is repealed.
8-9-412. Additional fees.
(a) A used tire program may charge an additional fee for the
collection and recycling of extra-large tires from sources other than
registered tire retailers and for any tires in excess of the maximum under §
8-9-414(b)(7).
(b) If a used tire program charges an additional fee under this
section, the fee shall be collected and retained by the used tire program for
costs related to the processing of extra-large tires.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 8-9-413 is amended to read as follows:
04-07-2025 14:26:21 JMB379

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 H4/7/25 SB238
8-9-413. Applicability.
The fees imposed by this subchapter shall not apply to:
(1) Large retreaded tires;
(2) Tires included as part of the equipment of a new vehicle; or
(3) Tires tires included as part of the equipment of a used
vehicle if included in or on the used vehicle at the time of sale and in the
sales price of the used vehicle.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code Title 8, Chapter 9, Subchapter 4, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
8-9-416. Online tire sales.
To the extent practicable, the tire recycling fees under this
subchapter shall be levied and collected on all online tire sales that
otherwise would be subject to tire recycling fees under this subchapter.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(104), concerning enumerated
special revenues collected as Division of Environmental Quality fees, is
amended to read as follows:
(104) All Division of Environmental Quality fees, unless
otherwise provided by law, § 8-1-105, landfill operator license fees, § 8-6-
909, and that portion of new tire waste tire recycling fees, § 8-9-404;

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(165), concerning the enumeration
of special revenues related to rim removal fees and import fees, is amended
to read as follows:
(165) That portion of rim removal tire recycling fees and import
fees, § 8-9-404;

/s/J. Payton







04-07-2025 14:26:21 JMB379